Massachusetts, session 194th, H3129.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5G of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as amended by section 19 of
chapter 28 of the Acts of 2023, is hereby further amended by inserting after the words
“Constitution of the Commonwealth”:- and the alignment surtax as defined in section 1 of
chapter 62
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Commissioner” the
following new definition:-
(b) “Alignment surtax”, a tax imposed at a rate of 3.5 per cent on Part C taxable income.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of said chapter 62, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “paragraph (b)”, in line 33, the following words:- plus the alignment
surtax
of 1